Maine, session 132, LD1324.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
ELECTRIC VEHICLES
§1500-X. Prohibition on misleading marketing and advertising practices
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is powered solely by an electric motor and
does not have an internal combustion engine.
B. "Gasoline-powered hybrid vehicle" means a vehicle that uses both an internal
combustion engine and an electric motor, with the primary power source being the
internal combustion engine, and that does not plug into an electrical outlet.
2. Deceptive marketing and advertising. A motor vehicle manufacturer or motor
vehicle dealer may not use deceptive marketing or advertising practices that falsely suggest
or imply that gasoline-powered hybrid vehicles are wholly or primarily powered by
electricity. Deceptive marketing and advertising practices include, but are not limited to:
A. Using phrases like "electrified," "beyond zero," "electric," "E," "EV" or "range"
regarding vehicles that are primarily powered by internal combustion engines; and
B. Using deceptive imagery, including, but not limited to, lightning bolts, batteries,
electric currents, plugs and sockets that could lead a reasonable consumer to believe
that gasoline-powered hybrid vehicles are wholly or largely powered by electricity.
3. Location and format. Deceptive marketing and advertising of gasoline-powered
hybrid vehicles are prohibited. The prohibition includes, but is not limited to, the following
formats:
A. Print marketing and advertising in newspapers, magazines and mailers;
B. Online marketing and advertising, including on social media and online videos;
C. Radio and television advertising; and
D. Signs, banners or other physical advertising at motor vehicle dealerships and at
promotional events.
4. Enforcement. The Attorney General may enforce this section.
5. Penalties. A violation of this section constitutes a violation of the Maine Unfair
Trade Practices Act.